Utah statutes.
17-3-7.   Pending civil and criminal actions.
All civil and criminal actions which shall be pending in the territory
embraced in such new county shall be prosecuted to judgment and execution
therein, and all actions pending in the district court in any county shall be
prosecuted to judgment and execution in the county in which the same are
pending, subject to change of venue as provided by law.
